Illinois, session 104th, HB3913.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $3,681,300, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Human Rights Commission for operational expenses of the 8Commission. 9    Section 10. The sum of $2,271,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Human Rights Commission for the Illinois Torture 12Inquiry and Relief Commission. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142025.